Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 3 Fire Escapes

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for the State Minimum Fire Safety Standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Safety Fire Commissioner, Ch. 120-3-3.

8-2-50.
Providing of fire escapes by building owners; requirements regarding location and construction of fire escapes and exit doors.

Owners of buildings more than two stories in height, not including the basement, who utilize any level above the second story wholly or partially as a factory or workshop shall provide more than one exit from each story of the building above the second story by stairways on the inside or outside of the building.

Such stairways shall be, as nearly as is practicable, at opposite ends of each story and so constructed that, in case of fire, the ground can readily be reached from the third and higher stories.

All stairways on the outside of buildings covered by this Code section shall have suitable railed landings at each story above the first and shall connect with each of said stories by doors or windows opening outward; and such doors, windows, and landings shall at all times be kept clear of obstructions.

All the main doors of such buildings, both inside and outside, shall open outward, and each story shall be amply supplied with fire-extinguishing devices.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 168, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2622; Civil Code 1910, § 3151; Code 1933, § 54-402.

Cross references.

Requirements regarding construction or maintenance of buildings presenting fire hazards to persons or property, §

25-2-13

et seq.

8-2-51.
Inspection of buildings; notifying owners regarding noncompliance with requirements relating to fire escapes.

The governing authority of the city where any building covered by Code Section 8-2-50 is situated, or the judge of the probate court of the county if the building is situated outside of any city, shall require the fire marshal or chief officer of the fire department or, if there is no fire marshal or chief firefighter, some other suitable official to inspect such buildings at least once a year and report in writing to the municipal authorities or the judge of the probate court that the requirements of Code Section 8-2-50 have or have not been complied with.

If the requirements of Code Section 8-2-50 have not been complied with, the municipal authorities or the judge of the probate court, as the case may be, shall convey to the owner of such building written notice requiring him to provide needed alterations or additions.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 168, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2623; Civil Code 1910, § 3152; Code 1933, § 54-403; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11.

8-2-52.
Requiring owners to make alterations and additions; time of making inspections and reports.

The owners of buildings referred to in this part shall make all alterations or additions necessary to comply with the requirements of this part. Inspections and reports required by Code Section 8-2-51 shall be made during the month of December of each year.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 168, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2625; Civil Code 1910, § 3154; Code 1933, § 54-405.

8-2-53.
Power of municipal authorities to extend coverage of part.

The governing authority of any city may, by ordinance, provide that this part shall apply to all buildings within the city limits which are not used as private residences and which are three or more stories in height.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 168, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2624; Civil Code 1910, § 3153; Code 1933, § 54-404.

8-2-54.
Penalty.

Any owner of a building more than two stories in height who fails to comply with the requirements of this part and who, after receiving the notice prescribed in Code Section 8-2-51, refuses or neglects to make the alterations specified in the written notice shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 168, § 5; Penal Code 1895, § 510; Penal Code 1910, § 511; Code 1933, § 54-9908.